Florida, session 2026, HB449.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (6) is added to section 337.195,
Florida Statutes, to read:
337.195 Limits on liability.—
(6) For purposes of this section, a contractor is
considered an agent of this state while acting within the scope
of the contract documents. The contract documents must, to the
extent permitted by law, provide for the indemnification of the
department for any liability, including reasonable attorney
fees, incurred up to the limits set forth in this chapter to the
extent caused by the negligence of the contractor or its
employees.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb449-00